Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-258
Administrative and teaching personnel; authorized actions.

Administrative and teaching personnel may take actions regarding student behavior, other than those specifically provided in the Student Discipline Act, which are reasonably necessary to aid the student, further school purposes, or prevent interference with the educational process. Such actions may include, but need not be limited to, counseling of students, parent conferences, referral to restorative justice practices or services, rearrangement of schedules, requirements that a student remain in school after regular hours to do additional work, restriction of extracurricular activity, or requirements that a student receive counseling, psychological evaluation, or psychiatric evaluation upon the written consent of a parent or guardian to such counseling or evaluation.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,172;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 62;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 40.

This section provides authority for school teachers and administrators to use physical contact short of corporal punishment to the degree necessary to preserve order and control in the school environment, and authorizes an acceptable level of incidental physical contact, as is necessary for teachers to promote personal interaction with their students. Daily v. Board of Ed. of Morrill Cty. School Dist. No. 62-0063, 256 Neb. 73, 588 N.W.2d 813 (1999).